Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 37
INTERSTATE COMPACT

Sec.

§ 63-3701. Multistate tax compact enacted.

The “Multistate Tax Compact” is hereby enacted into law and entered into with all jurisdictions legally joining therein, in the form substantially as follows:

ARTICLE I

ARTICLE II

ARTICLE III

ARTICLE IV

DIVISION OF INCOME

As used in this Article, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Business income” means income arising from transactions and activity in the regular course of the taxpayer’s trade or business and includes income from tangible and intangible property if the acquisition, management, and disposition of the property constitute integral parts of the taxpayer’s regular trade or business operations.

“Commercial domicile” means the principal place from which the trade or business of the taxpayer is directed or managed.

“Compensation” means wages, salaries, commissions and any other form of remuneration paid to employees for personal services.

“Financial organization” means any bank, trust company, savings bank, industrial bank, land bank, safe deposit company, private banker, savings and loan association, credit union, cooperative bank, small loan company, sales finance company, investment company, or any type of insurance company.

“Nonbusiness income” means all income other than business income.

“Public utility” means any business entity (1) which owns or operates any plant, equipment, property, franchise, or license for the transmission of communications, transportation of goods or persons, except by pipe line [pipeline], or the production, transmission, sale, delivery, or furnishing of electricity, water or steam; and (2) whose rates of charges for goods or services have been established or approved by a Federal, State or local government or governmental agency.

“Sales” means all gross receipts of the taxpayer not allocated under paragraphs of this Article.

“State” means any State of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, any Territory or Possession of the United States, and any foreign country or political subdivision thereof.

“This State” means the State in which the relevant tax return is filed or, in the case of application of this Article to the apportionment and allocation of income for local tax purposes, the subdivision or local taxing district in which the relevant tax return is filed.

2. Any taxpayer having income from business activity which is taxable both within and without this State, other than activity as a financial organization or public utility or the rendering of purely personal services by an individual, shall allocate and apportion his net income as provided in this Article. If a taxpayer has income from business activity as a public utility but derives the greater percentage of his income from activities subject to this Article, the taxpayer may elect to allocate and apportion his entire net income as provided in this Article.

3. For purposes of allocation and apportionment of income under this Article, a taxpayer is taxable in another State if (1) in that State he is subject to a net income tax, a franchise tax measured by net income, a franchise tax for the privilege of doing business, or a corporate stock tax, or (2) that State has jurisdiction to subject the taxpayer to a net income tax regardless of whether, in fact, the State does or does not.

4. Rents and royalties from real or tangible personal property, capital gains, interest, dividends or patent or copyright royalties, to the extent that they constitute nonbusiness income, shall be allocated as provided in paragraphs 5 through 8 of this Article.
5.(a) Net rents and royalties from real property located in this State are allocable to this State.

(b) Net rents and royalties from tangible personal property are allocable to this State: (1) if and to the extent that the property is utilized in this State, or (2) in their entirety if the taxpayer’s commercial domicile is in this State and the taxpayer is not organized under the laws of or taxable in the State in which the property is utilized.

(c) The extent of utilization of tangible personal property in a State is determined by multiplying the rents and royalties by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days of physical location of the property in the State during the rental or royalty period in the taxable year and the denominator of which is the number of days of physical location of the property everywhere during all rental or royalty periods in the taxable year. If the physical location of the property during the rental or royalty period is unknown or unascertainable by the taxpayer, tangible personal property is utilized in the State in which the property was located at the time the rental or royalty payer obtained possession.

6.(a) Capital gains and losses from sales of real property located in this State are allocable to this State.

(b) Capital gains and losses from sales of tangible personal property are allocable to this State if (1) the property had a situs in this State at the time of the sale, or (2) the taxpayer’s commercial domicile is in this State and the taxpayer is not taxable in the State in which the property had a situs.

(c) Capital gains and losses from sales of intangible personal property are allocable to this State if the taxpayer’s commercial domicile is in this State.

7. Interest and dividends are allocable to this State if the taxpayer’s commercial domicile is in this State.

8.(a) Patent and copyright royalties are allocable to this State: (1) if and to the extent that the patent or copyright is utilized by the payer in this State, or (2) if and to the extent that the patent [or] copyright is utilized by the payer in a State in which the taxpayer is not taxable and the taxpayer’s commercial domicile is in this State.

(b) A patent is utilized in a State to the extent that it is employed in production, fabrication, manufacturing, or other processing in the State or to the extent that a patented product is produced in the State. If the basis of receipts from patent royalties does not permit allocation to States or if the accounting procedures do not reflect States of utilization, the patent is utilized in the State in which the taxpayer’s commercial domicile is located.

(c) A copyright is utilized in a State to the extent that printing or other publication originates in the State. If the basis of receipts from copyright royalties does not permit allocation to States or if the accounting procedures do not reflect States of utilization, the copyright is utilized in the State in which the taxpayer’s commercial domicile is located.

9. All business income shall be apportioned to this State by multiplying the income by a fraction, the numerator of which is the property factor plus the payroll factor plus the sales factor, and the denominator of which is three.

10. The property factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the average value of the taxpayer’s real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used in this State during the tax period and the denominator of which is the average value of all the taxpayer’s real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used during the tax period.

11. Property owned by the taxpayer is valued at its original cost. Property rented by the taxpayer is valued at eight times the net annual rental rate. Net annual rental rate is the annual rental rate paid by the taxpayer less any annual rental rate received by the taxpayer from subrentals.
12. The average value of property shall be determined by averaging the values at the beginning and ending of the tax period but the tax administrator may require the averaging of monthly values during the tax period if reasonably required to reflect properly the average value of the taxpayer’s property.

13. The payroll factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the total amount paid in this State during the tax period by the taxpayer for compensation and the denominator of which is the total compensation paid everywhere during the tax period.

14. Compensation is paid in this State if:

(a) the individual’s service is performed entirely within the State;

(b) the individual’s service is performed both within and without the State, but the service performed without the State, is incidental to the individual’s service within the State; or

(c) some of the service is performed in the State and (1) the base of operations or, if there is no base of operations, the place from which the service is directed or controlled is in the State, or (2) the base of operations or the place from which the service is directed or controlled is not in any State in which some part of the service is performed, but the individual’s residence is in this State.

15. The sales factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the total sales of the taxpayer in this State during the tax period, and the denominator of which is the total sales of the taxpayer everywhere during the tax period.

16. Sales of tangible personal property are in this State if:

(a) the property is delivered or shipped to a purchaser, other than the United States Government, within this State regardless of the f.o.b. point or other conditions of the sale; or

(b) the property is shipped from an office, store, warehouse, factory, or other place of storage in this State and (1) the purchaser is the United States Government or (2) the taxpayer is not taxable in the State of the purchaser.

17. Sales, other than sales of tangible personal property, are in this State if:

(a) the income-producing activity is performed in this State; or

(b) the income-producing activity is performed both in and outside this State and a greater proportion of the income-producing activity is performed in this State than in any other State, based on costs of performance.

18. If the allocation and apportionment provisions of this Article do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer’s business activity in this State, the taxpayer may petition for or the tax administrator may require, in respect to all or any part of the taxpayer’s business activity, if reasonable:

(a) separate accounting;

(b) the exclusion of any one or more of the factors;

(c) the inclusion of one or more additional factors which will fairly represent the taxpayer’s business activity in this State; or

(d) the employment of any other method to effectuate an equitable allocation and apportionment of the taxpayer’s income.

ARTICLE V

ARTICLE VI

ARTICLE VII

ARTICLE VIII

ARTICLE IX

ARTICLE X

ARTICLE XI

ARTICLE XII

§ 63-3702. Optional reporting for sales.

Every multistate taxpayer as defined in said Compact and required to file a return in Idaho whose only activities within Idaho consist of sales and which does not own or rent real estate or tangible personal property and whose dollar volume of gross sales made during the tax year within this state is not in excess of the dollar volume prescribed in article III, section 2, of the Multistate Tax Compact may elect to report its income and pay tax to the state of Idaho at the rate of one per cent (1%) of such dollar volume.

§ 63-3703. Appointment to the multistate tax commission.

The governor, with the advise [advice] and consent of the senate, shall appoint a member of the Multistate Tax Commission to represent Idaho from among the persons made eligible by Article VI, Section 1.(a) of the Multistate Tax Compact.

§ 63-3704. Multistate tax commission — Designation of alternate.

The member representing Idaho on the multistate tax commission may be represented thereon by an alternate designated by him. The name of the alternate thus designated shall be filed with the multistate tax commission by the member representing this state.

§ 63-3705. Attorney general or designee to be nonvoting member.

The attorney general of this state or his designee shall be a nonvoting member of said commission representing this state.

§ 63-3706. Multistate Tax Compact advisory committee — Composition — Meetings — Purpose.

There is hereby established the Multistate Tax Compact advisory committee composed of the member of the multistate tax commission representing this state, any alternate designated by him, the attorney general or his designee, two members of the senate appointed by the lieutenant governor, and two members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker thereof. The chairman shall be the member of the commission representing this state. The committee shall meet on the call of its chairman or at the request of a majority of its members, but in any event it shall meet not less than once in each year. The committee may consider any and all matters relating to recommendations of the multistate tax commission as raised by any of its members.

§ 63-3707. Interstate audits participation — Limitation.

This state specifically adopts and agrees to participate in the interstate audits provided by article VIII of the Multistate Tax Compact and said article shall be in full force and effect in respect to this state; providing that the state tax commission shall determine the extent of participation by this state in such interstate audits.

§ 63-3708. Sharing of tax information.

The state tax commission at its discretion may furnish to the multistate tax commission, any information contained in tax returns and reports and related schedules and documents filed pursuant to the laws of this state and in the report of an audit or investigation made with respect thereto, provided only that said information be furnished solely for tax purposes; and the multistate tax commission may make said information available to the tax officials of any other state, the District of Columbia, the United States and its territories for tax purposes.

§ 63-3709. Multistate tax compact account — Creation — Appropriations.

There is hereby created in the office of the state treasurer and subject to his control and custody in the state operating fund an account to be known and designated as the “Multistate Tax Compact Account.”

All moneys collected as a direct result of audits or compliance activities conducted by the multistate tax commission or by employees of the state tax commission whose salaries are appropriated from the multistate tax compact account shall be paid by the state tax commission into the multistate tax compact account.

Upon receipt by the state tax commission of the budget of the multistate tax commission, and the statement of Idaho’s share of such budget to be appropriated, the state tax commission shall review said budget and Idaho’s share, and shall determine compliance or noncompliance of said budget and share with section 4(b) of article VI of the multistate tax compact. Upon reviewing said budget and Idaho’s share thereof, the state tax commission shall, on or before February 1 of each year, certify to the Senate finance committee, the House appropriations committee, the Senate local government and taxation committee, and the House revenue and taxation committee, that the budget and Idaho’s share thereof either comply or do not comply with the provisions of section 4(b) of article VI of the multistate tax compact. Unless the legislature determines otherwise prior to adjournment, the amounts which the state tax commission has certified as complying with section 4(b) of article VI are hereby continually appropriated from the multistate tax compact account to the multistate tax commission.

If, at any time, the funds in the multistate tax compact account exceed one hundred and ten percent (110%) of the most recent continuing annual appropriation to the multistate tax commission, the excess thereof shall be transferred to the general account [fund].

Payments to the multistate tax commission from the multistate tax compact account shall be made only with the approval of the state tax commission.